Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-151.5] Rent supplement;
qualification. Except as provided by federal law, nothing in this chapter
shall prevent a person who otherwise qualifies for rent supplement under this
chapter from taking up to ninety days (from the day the person's application
for rent supplement is approved) to secure a qualified rental dwelling;
provided that rent supplement payments shall not commence until a qualified
rental dwelling is secured. [L 2008, c 166, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next